Illinois, session 104th, SB1387.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Comptroller Act is amended by 5changing Section 9.03 as follows: 6    (15 ILCS 405/9.03)  (from Ch. 15, par. 209.03)7    Sec. 9.03. Direct deposit of State payments. 8    (a) The Comptroller, with the approval of the State 9Treasurer, may provide by rule or regulation for the direct 10deposit of any payment lawfully payable from the State 11Treasury and in accordance with federal banking regulations 12including but not limited to payments to (i) persons paid from 13personal services, (ii) persons receiving benefit payments 14from the Comptroller under the State pension systems, (iii) 15individuals who receive assistance under Articles III, IV, and 16VI of the Illinois Public Aid Code, (iv) providers of services 17under the Mental Health and Developmental Disabilities 18Administrative Act, (v) providers of community-based mental 19health services, and (vi) providers of services under programs 20administered by the State Board of Education, in the accounts 21of those persons or entities maintained at a bank, savings and 22loan association, or credit union, where authorized by the 23payee. The Comptroller also may deposit public aid payments   SB1387- 2 -LRB104 10470 SPS 20545 b1for individuals who receive assistance under Articles III, IV, 2VI, and X of the Illinois Public Aid Code directly into an 3electronic benefits transfer account in a financial 4institution approved by the State Treasurer as prescribed by 5the Illinois Department of Human Services and in accordance 6with the rules and regulations of that Department and the 7rules and regulations adopted by the Comptroller and the State 8Treasurer. The Comptroller, with the approval of the State 9Treasurer, may provide by rule for the electronic direct 10deposit of payments to public agencies and any other payee of 11the State. The electronic direct deposits may be made to the 12designated account in those financial institutions specified 13in this Section for the direct deposit of payments. Within 6 14months after the effective date of this amendatory Act of 151994, the Comptroller shall establish a pilot program for the 16electronic direct deposit of payments to local school 17districts, municipalities, and units of local government. The 18payments may be made without the use of the voucher-warrant 19system, provided that documentation of approval by the 20Treasurer of each group of payments made by direct deposit 21shall be retained by the Comptroller. The form and method of 22the Treasurer's approval shall be established by the rules or 23regulations adopted by the Comptroller under this Section.24    (b) Except as provided in subsection (b-5), all State 25payments for an employee's payroll or an employee's expense 26reimbursement must be made through direct deposit. It is the   SB1387- 3 -LRB104 10470 SPS 20545 b1responsibility of the paying State agency to ensure compliance 2with this mandate. If a State agency pays an employee's 3payroll or an employee's expense reimbursement without using 4direct deposit, the Comptroller may charge that employee a 5processing fee of $2.50 per paper warrant. The processing fee 6may be withheld from the employee's payment or reimbursement. 7The amount collected from the fee shall be deposited into the 8Comptroller's Administrative Fund.9    (b-5) If an employee wants his or her payments deposited 10into a secure check account, the employee must submit a direct 11deposit form to the paying State agency for his or her payroll 12or to the Comptroller for his or her expense reimbursements. 13Upon acceptance of the direct deposit form, the Comptroller 14shall disburse those funds to the secure check account. For 15the purposes of this Section, "secure check account" means an 16account established with a financial institution for the 17employee that allows the dispensing of the funds in the 18account through a third party who dispenses to the employee a 19paper check. 20    (c) All State payments to a vendor that exceed the 21allowable limit of paper warrants in a fiscal year, by the same 22agency, must be made through direct deposit. It is the 23responsibility of the paying State agency to ensure compliance 24with this mandate. If a State agency pays a vendor more times 25than the allowable limit in a single fiscal year without using 26direct deposit, the Comptroller may charge the vendor a   SB1387- 4 -LRB104 10470 SPS 20545 b1processing fee of $2.50 per paper warrant. The processing fee 2may be withheld from the vendor's payment. The amount 3collected from the processing fee shall be deposited into the 4Comptroller's Administrative Fund. The Office of the 5Comptroller shall define "allowable limit" in the 6Comptroller's Statewide Accounting Management System (SAMS) 7manual, except that the allowable limit shall not be less than 830 paper warrants. The Office of the Comptroller shall also 9provide reasonable notice to all State agencies of the 10allowable limit of paper warrants.11    (c-1) All State payments to an entity from a payroll or 12retirement voluntary deduction must be made through direct 13deposit. If an entity receives a payment from a payroll or 14retirement voluntary deduction without using direct deposit, 15the Comptroller may charge the entity a processing fee of 16$2.50 per paper warrant. The processing fee may be withheld 17from the entity's payment or billed to the entity at a later 18date. The amount collected from the processing fee shall be 19deposited into the Comptroller's Administrative Fund. The 20Comptroller shall provide reasonable notice to all entities 21impacted by this requirement. Any new entities that receive a 22payroll or retirement voluntary deduction must sign up for 23direct deposit during the application process. 24    (c-2) The detail information, such as names, identifiers, 25and amounts, associated with a State payment to an entity from 26a payroll or retirement voluntary deduction must be retrieved   SB1387- 5 -LRB104 10470 SPS 20545 b1by the entity from the Comptroller's designated Internet 2website or an electronic alternative approved by the 3Comptroller. If the entity requires the Comptroller to mail 4the detail information, the Comptroller may charge the entity 5a processing fee up to $25.00 per mailing. Any processing fee 6will be billed to the entity at a later date. The amount 7collected from the processing fee shall be deposited into the 8Comptroller's Administrative Fund. The Comptroller shall 9provide reasonable notice to all entities impacted by this 10requirement. 11    (c-3) All State payments that are recurring payments to a 12vendor shall be made through direct deposit. It is the 13responsibility of the paying State agency to ensure compliance 14with this mandate. As used in this subsection, "recurring 15payment" means any payment with a fixed deadline that occurs 16more than once, including, but not limited to, utility 17payments, payments for internet services, and payments for 18construction services.19    (d) State employees covered by provisions in collective 20bargaining agreements that do not require direct deposit of 21paychecks are exempt from this mandate. No later than 60 days 22after the effective date of this amendatory Act of the 97th 23General Assembly, all State agencies must provide to the 24Office of the Comptroller a list of employees that are exempt 25under this subsection (d) from the direct deposit mandate. In 26addition, a State employee or vendor may file a hardship   SB1387- 6 -LRB104 10470 SPS 20545 b1petition with the Office of the Comptroller requesting an 2exemption from the direct deposit mandate under this Section. 3A hardship petition shall be made available for download on 4the Comptroller's official Internet website. 5    (e) Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, 6the direct deposit of State payments under this Section for an 7employee's payroll, an employee's expense reimbursement, or a 8State vendor's payment does not authorize the State to 9automatically withdraw funds from those accounts.10    (f) For the purposes of this Section, "vendor" means a 11non-governmental entity with a taxpayer identification number 12issued by the Social Security Administration or Internal 13Revenue Service that receives payments through the 14Comptroller's commercial system. The term does not include 15State agencies.16    (g) The requirements of this Section do not apply to the 17legislative or judicial branches of State government. 18(Source: P.A. 97-348, eff. 8-12-11; 97-993, eff. 9-16-12; 1998-463, eff. 8-16-13; 98-1043, eff. 8-25-14.) 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.